California statutes. Water Code
Beginning at the most Northwesterly corner of the Claremont Improvement District, as described above; thence Southerly and Westerly along the Westerly edge of said Claremont Improvement District to the intersection with the center line of Briarcroft Road as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Westerly along said center line and its Westerly prolongation to its intersection with the center line of Williams Avenue as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Southerly along the center line of Williams Avenue to the intersection with the center line of Foothill Boulevard as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northwesterly along said center line of Foothill Boulevard to its intersection with the Easterly boundary of the City of La Verne as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence generally Southerly, Westerly, and Northerly along the said corporate city boundary to the center line of Puddingstone Drive as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Westerly along the center line of Puddingstone Drive to its intersection with the Easterly boundary of the Los Angeles County Flood Control District Puddingstone Channel Right of Way as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly along said Right of Way boundary to its intersection with the Southeasterly boundary of the Los Angeles County Flood Control District San Dimas Wash Reservoir site; thence Northerly along said Reservoir site Easterly boundary and its Northeasterly prolongation to the center line of Section 36, T.1N., R.9W.; thence North along said center line to the Northerly line of said Section 36; thence West along said Northerly line to its intersection with the center line of San Dimas Canyon Road as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly on the centerline of San Dimas Canyon Road to its point of intersection with the Northerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Easterly along said Northerly boundary to the point of beginning.
 
SAN DIMAS IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
Beginning at a point in the Northerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District, said point also being the center of Section 27, T.1N.—R.9W. S.B.B.M.; thence Easterly along said District boundary to the Northwesterly corner of the La Verne Improvement District as described above; thence Southerly along said Westerly La Verne Boundary and its Southeasterly prolongation to the Northerly Right of Way of Ganesha Boulevard as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Southwesterly along said Northerly Right of Way of Ganesha Boulevard to the Northerly Right of Way of U.S. 10 (San Bernardino Freeway) as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Southwesterly along said Northerly Right of Way to the Westerly boundary of the Rancho San Jose, said point also being the point of intersection with the Northerly prolongation of the Northwesterly property line of the California Polytechnic University (Kellogg Campus); thence Southeasterly along said prolongation to the most Northerly and Westerly corner of the California State Polytechnic University property as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Southerly and Westerly along the Northwesterly property lines of the California Polytechnic University and Mt. San Antonio Junior College properties to its intersection with the Easterly Right of Way of Grand Avenue as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly along the Southerly prolongation of the Northwesterly corporate boundary of the City of Walnut as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence continuing Northwesterly and Northeasterly along said corporate boundary to the most Northerly point of the City of Walnut as same existed on July 1, 1974, said point also being the Westerly property line of the Forest Lawn Memorial Park as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence North along said Westerly property line and its prolongation to the intersection with the Northerly Right of Way of U.S. 10 (San Bernardino Freeway) as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Easterly along said Right of Way to its intersection with the corporate boundary of the City of San Dimas as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northwesterly and Northeasterly along said corporate boundary to its intersection with the Covina corporate boundary as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northeasterly, Westerly, and North along said Covina boundary and its Northerly prolongation to the center line of Badillo Street as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Westerly on the center line of Badillo Street to its intersection with the center line of Banna Avenue as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence North along the center line of Banna Avenue to the center line of Ruddock Street as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Westerly along the center line of Ruddock Street to the intersection of the center line of Glendora Avenue as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence North on the center line of Glendora Avenue to the Northerly line of the Southern Pacific Railroad Right of Way as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Southwesterly along said Right of Way to its intersection with the Westerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence generally Northerly, Westerly, and Northerly along the District boundary to its intersection with the center line of Arrow Highway as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence East on the center line of Arrow Highway to its intersection with the corporate boundary of the City of San Dimas as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence generally Northerly, Easterly, and Northerly along said corporate boundary to the point of beginning. 
 
GLENDORA IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
Beginning at a point on the Northerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974, said point also being the center of Section 27, T.1N., R.9W. S.B.B.M; thence Southerly and Westerly along the Westerly boundary of the above mentioned San Dimas Improvement District to the Westerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly and Easterly around said Pomona Valley Municipal Water District’s Westerly and Northerly boundary to the point of beginning. 
 
COVINA IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
Beginning at a point in the Westerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974, said point also being the center line of U.S. 10 (San Bernardino Freeway); thence North and East along said District boundary to its point of intersection with the Northerly Right of Way line of the Southern Pacific Railroad as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly and Southerly along the San Dimas Improvement District boundary as described above to the most Northerly point in the corporate boundary of the City of Walnut as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Southerly and Westerly along said corporate boundary to the Westerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence North along said Westerly boundary to the point of beginning. 
 
POMONA IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
Beginning at a point on the Easterly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District, said point being the most Southeasterly corner of the Claremont Improvement District as herein described above; thence Southerly, Westerly, and Southerly along said Easterly District boundary and the Southerly and Westerly boundary of the city of Pomona to its point of intersection with the Easterly corporate boundary of the City of Walnut as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly along said corporate boundary to its point of intersection with the Southerly boundary of the San Dimas Improvement district as described above; thence Easterly along said above described Southerly San Dimas, La Verne, and Claremont Improvement District boundaries to the point of beginning. 
 
DIAMOND BAR IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
Beginning at a point in the Easterly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974, said point also being the intersection of the Southerly corporate boundary of the City of Pomona as same existed on July 1, 1974, with the Los Angeles County boundary; thence Southerly and Westerly along the Easterly and Southerly boundary of the District to its intersection with the center line of the California No. 57 Right of Way (Orange Freeway) as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northeasterly along said center line to the Westerly boundary of Sections 32, 29, and 20, T.2S.-R.9W. S.B.B.M.; thence North along said Westerly boundary lines to the North boundary line of Section 20, T.2S.-R.9W. S.B.B.M.; thence East along said North line to the center line of said mentioned California No. 57 Right of Way (Orange Freeway) as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northeasterly along said center line to the West boundary of Sections 10 and 3, T.2S.-R.9W. S.B.B.M.; thence North along said Westerly boundary to its intersection with the corporate boundary of the City of Pomona, said line also being a point in the Southerly boundary of Pomona Improvement District as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northeasterly and Southeasterly along said Southern boundary of Pomona Improvement District to the point of beginning. 
 
WALNUT IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
Beginning at the point on the Westerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District, said point also being the intersection of the corporate boundary of the City of Walnut as same existed on July 1, 1974, and the most Southwesterly point of Covina Improvement District as described above; thence Easterly along the Southerly and Westerly boundaries of the Covina, San Dimas, Pomona, and Diamond Bar Improvement Districts to the point of intersection with the Southerly boundary of the Walnut Valley Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Westerly and Northerly along the Southerly and Westerly boundary of said Walnut Valley Water District to the point of intersection with the Southerly projection of the center line of Nogales Avenue as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence North on said center line of Nogales Avenue and its Northerly prolongation to its intersection with the Easterly Corporate boundary of the City of West Covina as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly along said Easterly boundary to its intersection with the Westerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly along said District boundary to the point of beginning. 
 
ROWLAND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
Beginning at a point in the Southerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974, said point also being the center line of the California No. 57 Right of Way (Orange Freeway) and the Southwesterly corner of the Diamond Bar Improvement District as described above; thence Westerly, Northerly, and Easterly along said Southwesterly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District to the point of intersection with the Walnut Improvement District as described above; thence Southerly along the Westerly boundary of the Walnut and Diamond Bar Improvement Districts to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Definitions [72066. - 72066.6.]

72066.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the meaning described in this article:

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72066.1.

“Board” shall mean the Board of Directors of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72066.2.

“Charges” shall mean charges made for metered water or for minimum charges for services, including customers’ charges, service charges, demand charges, and capacity charges, but shall not include charges made for water which is to be resold and delivered through mains or pipes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72066.3.

“Month” shall mean a calendar month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72066.4.

“Person” shall mean any domestic or foreign corporation, association, syndicate, joint stock company, partnership of any kind, joint venture, club, Massachusetts business or common law trust, society, individual, municipal corporation, and the state and any political subdivision thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72066.5.

“Service user” shall mean any person required to pay a tax imposed under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72066.6.

“Service supplier” shall mean any person required to collect a tax under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Powers—Generally [72067. - 72071.1.]

72067.

The board may exercise all of its powers and duties in regard to improvement districts established by this chapter in the same manner as to improvement districts otherwise formed under the provisions of this division, in addition to the manner otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72068.

Any portion of the district, whether contiguous or not to an improvement district established by this chapter, may be annexed to such improvement district in the manner provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 72670) of Part 11 of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72069.

Any portion of the district may be excluded from an improvement district established by this chapter in the manner provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 72040) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72070.

The board may advance general funds of the district to accomplish the purposes of an improvement district performed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72071.

The board may repay the district for any advance of funds, together with interest, at a rate not to exceed the interest value of money to the district, from any combination of the following sources:

(a) The proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized for the purposes of the improvement district.

(b) The taxes levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the improvement district.

(c) Revenue derived from any source set forth in Section 72077 hereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72071.1.

The board may levy an ad valorem property tax in each improvement district established pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 72062) of this chapter, sufficient to pay the share of the maintenance and operation costs of any improvements constructed from the proceeds of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter, for each such improvement district. The authorization of the bonds by the voters shall constitute authorization of the ad valorem property tax herein provided and no election need be held as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2201) of Part 4 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Powers—Utility Tax [72072. - 72072.12.]

72072.

In addition to the powers otherwise provided for improvement districts under this division, the board shall have the power to levy a utility tax, as provided by this article, on every person using water within any of the improvement districts established by this chapter or on every person using water within the service area of any retail water purveyor within any such improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.1.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as imposing a tax upon any person when the imposition of such tax upon that person would be in violation of the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, persons subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission need not obtain an authorization from the commission to comply with the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.3.

The board hereby is authorized to impose a tax upon every person using water within any of the improvement districts established by this chapter or on every person using water within the service area of any retail water purveyor within any such improvement district, at the rate and in the manner provided in this article. The tax imposed by this section shall be a percentage of the charges made for such use of water and shall be paid by the person paying for such water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.4.

The tax imposed in this article shall be collected from the service user by the service supplier. The amount collected in one month shall be remitted to the board on or before the last day of the following month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.5.

The taxes imposed by this article shall be collected, insofar as practicable, at the same time as, and along with, the charges made in accordance with the regular billing practice of the service supplier. If the amount paid by a service user to a service supplier is less than the full amount of the charge and the tax which has accrued for the billing period, a proportionate share of both the charge and the tax shall be deemed to have been paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.6.

Taxes collected from the service user which are not remitted to the board on or before the due dates provided in this article are delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.7.

Interest and penalties for delinquency in remittance of any tax collected by a service supplier and not remitted to the board shall be assessed as follows:

(a) Any service supplier who fails to remit any tax imposed by this article within 30 days after receipt of written notice from the board of such failure shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the tax.

(b) If the board determines that the nonpayment of any remittance due under this article is due to fraud, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the tax shall be added thereto in addition to the penalty stated in subdivision (a).

(c) In addition to the penalties imposed in this section, any service supplier who fails to remit any tax imposed by this part, shall pay interest at the rate of 1 percent per month, or fraction thereof, on the amount of the tax exclusive of penalties, from the date on which the remittance first became delinquent until paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.8.

Failure by a service user to pay any tax imposed by this article shall result in the following interest and penalties on the service user:

(a) Any service user who fails to pay any tax imposed by this article within 90 days of the date of receipt of notice of the amount of tax due from the service supplier shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the unpaid tax.

(b) In addition to the penalty imposed in this section, any service user who fails to pay any tax imposed by this article, shall pay interest at the rate of 6 percent per annum, exclusive of penalties, from the date on which the remittance first became delinquent until paid, and a collection charge of five dollars ($5) for each delinquent account.

(c) The penalties, interest, and collection charges imposed by this section shall not be billed or collected by the service supplier, but shall be determined and collected by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.9.

Any tax required to be paid by a service user under the provisions of this article shall be deemed a debt owed by the service user to the district. Any tax collected from a service user which has not been remitted to the board shall be deemed a debt owed to the district by the person required to collect and remit such tax. Nothing in this article shall impose any obligation upon a service supplier to take any legal action to enforce the collection of the utility users tax imposed by this article. Amounts uncollected by a service supplier shall be referred to the board for collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.10.

The board shall enforce the provisions of this article and may prescribe, adopt and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this article. The board shall not prescribe, adopt or enforce any rule or regulation which has the effect, directly or indirectly, of altering the terms and conditions of service of a service supplier serving the general public. Rules and regulations prescribed and adopted by the board shall not be inconsistent with procedures established from time to time by a service supplier serving the general public for the purpose of billing, collecting and accounting for charges in the conduct of its business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.11.

Whenever the amount of any tax has been overpaid or paid more than once or had been erroneously or illegally collected or received by the board, it may be refunded, provided that a claim therefor in writing is filed with the board within two years of the date of payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72072.12.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 72072.11, a service supplier may claim a refund or take as credit against taxes collected and remitted the amount overpaid, paid more than once, or erroneously or illegally collected or received when it is established in a manner prescribed by the board that the service user from whom the tax has been collected did not owe the tax; provided, however, that neither a refund nor a credit shall be allowed unless the amount of the tax so collected has either been refunded to the service user or credited to charges subsequently payable by the service user to the person required to collect and remit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Determination of and Alternative Methods of Payment of Debt Service and Costs of Maintenance and Operation [72073. - 72077.]

72073.

The board annually shall cause to be prepared a written report stating the reasons for and conclusions of the board upon the following, together with any additional information deemed by the board to be relevant to such conclusions:

(a) The amount of the total debt service payable by the district for the following fiscal year on any bonded indebtedness incurred pursuant to this chapter, and the estimated maintenance and operation costs of the improvements for such fiscal year.

(b) The amount of such total debt service and maintenance and operation costs proposed to be raised in each of the improvement districts established under the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with the estimated benefits to be received by the landowners, water users, and inhabitants of each such improvement district during the following fiscal year.

(c) The projected retail water sales within each such improvement district for the following fiscal year, stated by volume and anticipated revenue.

Such report shall be mailed at least 20 days before the hearing provided for in Section 72074 to (1) each retail water purveyor with a service area wholly or partly within the district, and (2) any other interested party having made written request therefor at least 20 days before such hearing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72074.

Annually, prior to approving the annual budget for the district, the board of directors shall hold a public hearing for the purpose of considering the report made pursuant to this article, and to determine the amount of debt service and maintenance and operation costs to be raised in each of the improvement districts established hereby and the method of payment of such amount in each such improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72075.

Notice of the hearing to be held pursuant to Section 72074 shall be given by publishing a copy, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, at least 15 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation within the district, if there is a newspaper of such circulation within the district. Such notice also shall be given by posting a copy in three public places within each of the improvement districts established under this chapter for at least two weeks before the time fixed for the hearing.

The notice of such hearing shall state the following:

(a) The time and place for the hearing by the board.

(b) The amount of such debt service and maintenance and operation costs proposed to be raised in each improvement district established by this chapter.

(c) That an ad valorem tax will be levied in each improvement district in an amount sufficient to pay the bond debt service and maintenance and operation costs required for the following fiscal year by each improvement district, to the extent that alternative methods of payment are not available for such purpose under the provisions of this chapter.

(d) That at such time and place any person interested will be heard on the questions of such amount of debt service and maintenance and operation costs and the availability of such alternative methods of payment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72076.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall, by resolution, determine the following:

(a) The amount of the total debt service on any bond indebtedness incurred pursuant to this chapter and the amount of the maintenance and operation costs to be paid by each improvement district established hereunder, in accordance with the estimated benefits to be received by the landowners, water users, and inhabitants of each such improvement district.

(b) The method of payment of such debt service and maintenance and operation costs in each such improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72077.

The amount of such debt service and maintenance and operation costs to be raised in each improvement district established under this chapter shall be paid by an ad valorem tax, to the extent that such payment is not paid by one or more of the following alternative methods:

(a) Payment of funds to the district from water revenues or other income of the retail water purveyors within each such improvement district pursuant to a contract therefor, which shall constitute a lien upon such revenues and income. Notwithstanding the foregoing, such payment shall not be used unless and until a declaration of a majority of purveyors, stating their intention to use a specified amount of water service revenues or other income as such an alternative method of payment is filed with the board and there is shown to the satisfaction of the board that the financial condition of such purveyor reasonably will assure such payment. Such payment shall be made to the district on or before the date on which it would have received funds if it levied an ad valorem tax in lieu of such alternative method of payment.

If any such purveyor fails to make any or all of such payment, the amount of such delinquency, plus a penalty of 8 percent per annum, shall be paid by such defaulting purveyor through appropriate proceedings brought by the district.

(b) Collection of the utility tax pursuant to Sections 72072 to 72072.12, inclusive.

(c) Water standby or availability charges in any such improvement district fixed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 71630) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of this division.

(d) Water revenues of the district derived from sales of water within each such improvement district pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 71610) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of this division.

The board shall not use any of such alternative methods of payment if a written protest against such use is filed with the board, prior to the conclusion of the hearing held pursuant to this chapter, by the retail water purveyors within each such improvement district providing the majority of retail water service within such improvement district by volume and number of services.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, if such a written protest is filed, the board may nonetheless use any such alternative means of payment, other than that specified in subdivision (a), upon the affirmative vote of four directors.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8.5. EXCLUSION OF TERRITORY FROM IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS [72080. - 72089.5.]

72080.

Proceedings to exclude territory from an improvement district, formed pursuant to this division, may be initiated by the board upon its own motion, or shall be initiated by the board upon receipt of a petition for exclusion signed by not less than 10 percent of the voters of the area proposed to be excluded, which states reasons such exclusion will be beneficial to the district or the improvement district or the territory to be excluded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

72081.

Upon adoption of a motion to initiate exclusion proceedings or upon receipt of a petition for exclusion, the board shall adopt a resolution of intention to exclude which shall state:

(a) The method by which the exclusion proceedings were initiated; by motion of the board or by petition of voters.

(b) That taxes for carrying out the purpose of an improvement district formed pursuant to Part 8 (commencing with Section 72000) will not be levied upon taxable property in the excluded territory following such exclusion.

(c) That taxes for the payment of principal and interest on any outstanding bonds of an improvement district will not be levied upon taxable property in the excluded territory following such exclusion, or, at the option of the board, that taxes for the payment of principal and interest on any outstanding bonds of an improvement district will continue to be levied upon taxable property in the excluded territory following such exclusion.

(d) That following such exclusion, the taxable property in the territory remaining in the improvement district shall continue to be levied upon and taxed to provide funds for the purposes of the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

72082.

The resolution of intention to exclude shall also state that a map showing the exterior boundaries of the proposed territory to be excluded, with relation to the territory remaining in the improvement district, is on file with the secretary and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested. The map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed exclusion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

72083.

The resolution of intention shall also state:

(a) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the questions of the proposed exclusion and the effect of such exclusion upon the district, the improvement district and the territory to be excluded.

(b) That at such time and place any person interested, including all persons owning property in the district or in the improvement district, will be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

72084.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution of intention to exclude, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, prior to the time fixed for the hearing in a newspaper circulated in the municipal water district, if there is a newspaper circulated in the district. Such notice shall also be given by posting a copy of the resolution of intention to exclude in three public places within the affected improvement district for at least two weeks before the time fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

72085.

At the time and place so fixed in the resolution of intention to exclude, or at any time or place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing.

At the hearing any person interested, including any person owning property in the district, or in the improvement district may appear and present any matters material to the questions set forth in the resolution of intention to exclude.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

72086.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall by resolution determine whether it is necessary or desirable to exclude the territory. If so, the resolution shall also state:

(a) The reasons why such exclusion is necessary or desirable.

(b) That the exterior boundaries of the improvement district following such exclusion are set forth on a map on file with the secretary, which map shall govern all details as to the extent of the then existing improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

72087.

The determinations made in the resolution of exclusion shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

72088.

After the exclusion of territory from the improvement district pursuant to this division, all taxes levied for the carrying out of the improvement district’s purpose shall be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the improvement district as then constituted, except that taxes shall continue to be levied upon the taxable property in the territory excluded for the payment of principal and interest on any outstanding bonds of the improvement district, if the board so determines in the resolution of exclusion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

72089.

A copy of the resolution of exclusion shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper printed and published in the district, if there is a newspaper printed and published in the district. A copy of the resolution shall also be posted in three public places within the improvement district for at least two weeks.

The resolution of exclusion shall not be effective until the 31st day after completion of the publication and posting.

This section shall not apply if the board has received the written consent of the owners of all the territory to be excluded therefrom. The written consent shall include the terms and conditions of exclusion, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

72089.5.

Any action or proceeding in which the validity of the exclusion of territory from the improvement district or of any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied shall be commenced within three months from the effective date of the resolution of exclusion; otherwise, the exclusion and all proceedings in relation thereto shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. TAXES [72090. - 72146.]



  CHAPTER 1. Taxes Generally [72090. - 72102.]

72090.

A district may cause taxes to be levied, in the manner provided in this part, for the purpose of paying any obligation of the district, including its formation expenses and any warrants issued therefor. The amount of this levy shall not exceed the amount permitted by any maximum property tax rate limitation in the Revenue and Taxation Code, provided, however, that if no tax was levied by the district in either the 1971–1972 or 1972–1973 fiscal year and the district incurred expenses in such years, which expenses were paid from revenues other than taxes, then the maximum levy shall not exceed fifty cents ($0.50) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

72090.5.

A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

72091.

If the revenues of the district, or of any improvement district therein, are or in the judgment of the board will probably be inadequate for any cause to pay the principal of or interest on any bonded debt of the district, or any improvement district thereof, as it becomes due and also the amounts set forth in Section 71616, the board shall cause a tax to be levied, as provided in this part, sufficient to provide for such deficit and to pay the amount of such principal and interest that will become due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72092.

If, in the opinion of the board of a municipal water district, the corporate area of which has been included in or annexed to a metropolitan water district as a unit, the revenues of the municipal water district will be inadequate for any cause to pay the operating expense of such district, to provide for repairs and depreciation of works owned or operated by it, and to meet all of its obligations the board shall provide for the levy and collection of a tax, in the manner provided in this part, sufficient to raise the amount of money determined by the board to be necessary for the purpose of paying the operating expenses of such district, providing for repairs and depreciation of works owned or operated by it, and meeting all of its obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72093.
